Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 38 Riotous Assembly

11-38-1 — 11-38-4.
Repealed.

11-38-5.
Inciting riot at correctional institution.

Any person who, with intent to cause a riotous assembly at the adult correctional institutions, shall incite a riot or a continuance of a riot or destruction of property while rioting, shall, upon being found guilty of the offense, be fined not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or shall be imprisoned not exceeding ten (10) years, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 148, § 1.

11-38-6.
Inciting riot at municipal detention facility.

Any prisoner, detainee, or other person incarcerated or confined at the Donald W. Wyatt Detention Facility in the city of Central Falls who, with intent to cause a riotous assembly at the Donald W. Wyatt Detention Facility created under chapter 54 of title 45, incites a riot or any continuance of a riot or destruction of property while rioting shall, upon conviction, be imprisoned at the adult correctional institutions for a term not to exceed ten (10) years, or be fined an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both; that term commences at the expiration of the original term of imprisonment of the prisoner.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 362, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 477, § 2.